California statutes. Corporations Code
(C) A pension or profit-sharing trust of the issuer, a self-employed individual retirement plan, or an individual retirement account, if the investment decisions made on behalf of the trust, plan, or account are made
 solely by persons who are qualified purchasers.

(D) An organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, corporation, Massachusetts or similar business trust, or partnership, each with total assets in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) according to its most recent audited financial statements.

(E) A natural person who, either individually or jointly with the person’s spouse, (i) has a minimum net worth of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) and had, during the immediately preceding tax year, gross income in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and reasonably expects gross income in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) during the current tax year or (ii) has a minimum net worth of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). “Net worth” shall be determined exclusive of home, home furnishings, and automobiles.
 Other assets included in the computation of net worth may be valued at fair market value.

Each natural person specified above, by reason of that person’s business or financial experience, or the business or financial experience of that person’s professional adviser, who is unaffiliated with and who is not compensated, directly or indirectly, by the issuer or any affiliate or selling agent of the issuer, can be reasonably assumed to have the capacity to protect that person’s interests in connection with the transaction.

The amount of the investment of each natural person shall not exceed 10 percent of the net worth, as determined by this subdivision, of that natural person.

(F) Any other purchaser designated as qualified by rule of the commissioner.

(2) Each purchaser represents that the purchaser
 is purchasing for the purchaser’s own account (or trust account, if the purchaser is a trustee) and not with a view to or for sale in connection with a distribution of the security.

(3) Each natural person purchaser, including a corporation, partnership, or other organization specifically formed by natural persons for the purpose of acquiring the securities offered by the issuer, receives, at least five business days before securities described in this subdivision are sold to, or a commitment to purchase is accepted from, the purchaser, the following information in writing:

(A) The name, principal business and mailing address, and telephone number of the issuer.

(B) The suitability standards for prospective purchasers as set forth in paragraph (1) of this subdivision.

(C) A description of the issuer’s type of business organization and the state in which the issuer is organized or incorporated.

(D) A brief description of the business of the issuer.

(E) If the issuer retains ownership or becomes the beneficiary of the insurance policy, an audit report of an independent certified public accountant together with a balance sheet and related statements of income, retained earnings, and cashflows that reflect the issuer’s financial position, the results of the issuer’s operations, and the issuer’s cashflows as of a date within 15 months before the date of the initial issuance of the securities described in this subdivision. The financial statements listed in this subparagraph shall be prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles. If the date of the audit report is more
 than 120 days before the date of the initial issuance of the securities described in this subdivision, the issuer shall provide unaudited interim financial statements.

(F) The names of all directors, officers, partners, members, or trustees of the issuer.

(G) A description of any order, judgment, or decree that is final as to the issuing entity of any state, federal, or foreign country governmental agency or administrator, or of any state, federal, or foreign country court of competent jurisdiction (i) revoking, suspending, denying, or censuring for cause any license, permit, or other authority of the issuer or of any director, officer, partner, member, trustee, or person owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interest or equity securities of the issuer, to engage in the securities, commodities, franchise, insurance, real estate, or
 lending business or in the offer or sale of securities, commodities, franchises, insurance, real estate, or loans, (ii) permanently restraining, enjoining, barring, suspending, or censuring any such person from engaging in or continuing any conduct, practice, or employment in connection with the offer or sale of securities, commodities, franchises, insurance, real estate, or loans, (iii) convicting any such person of, or pleading nolo contendere by any such person to, any felony or misdemeanor involving a security, commodity, franchise, insurance, real estate, or loan, or any aspect of the securities, commodities, franchise, insurance, real estate, or lending business, or involving dishonesty, fraud, deceit, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property, or (iv) holding any such person liable in a civil action involving breach of a fiduciary duty, fraud, deceit, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property. This subparagraph does not apply to any order,
 judgment, or decree that has been vacated, overturned, or is more than 10 years old.

(H) Notice of the purchaser’s right to rescind or cancel the investment and receive a refund pursuant to Section 25508.5.

(I) The name, address, and telephone number of the issuing insurance company, and the name, address, and telephone number of the state or foreign country regulator of the insurance company.

(J) The total face value of the insurance policy and the percentage of the insurance policy the purchaser will own.

(K) The insurance policy number, issue date, and type.

(L) If a group insurance policy, the name, address, and telephone number of the group, and, if applicable, the material terms and
 conditions of converting the policy to an individual policy, including the amount of increased premiums.

(M) If a term insurance policy, the term and the name, address, and telephone number of the person who will be responsible for renewing the policy if necessary.

(N) That the insurance policy is beyond the state statute for contestability and the reason therefor.

(O) The insurance policy premiums and terms of premium payments.

(P) The amount of the purchaser’s moneys that will be set aside to pay premiums.

(Q) The name, address, and telephone number of the person who will be the insurance policy owner and the person who will be responsible for paying premiums.

(R) The date on which the purchaser will be required to pay premiums and the amount of the premium, if known.

(S) A statement to the effect that any projected rate of return to the purchaser from the purchase of a viatical or life settlement contract or a fractionalized or pooled interest therein is based on an estimated life expectancy for the person insured under the life insurance policy; that the return on the purchase may vary substantially from the expected rate of return based upon the actual life expectancy of the insured that may be less than, equal to, or may greatly exceed the estimated life expectancy; and that the rate of return would be higher if the actual life expectancy were less than, and lower if the actual life expectancy were greater than the estimated life expectancy of the insured at the time the viatical or life settlement contract was closed.

(T) A statement that the purchaser should consult with the purchaser’s tax adviser regarding the tax consequences of the purchase of the viatical or life settlement contract or fractionalized or pooled interest therein and, if the purchaser is using retirement funds or accounts for that purchase, whether or not any adverse tax consequences might result from the use of those funds for the purchase of that investment.

(U) Any other information as may be prescribed by rule of the commissioner.

(r) Any offer or sale of any security that meets each of the following criteria:

(1) The issuer meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Is a California corporation or a foreign corporation, which at the
 time of filing an application under this subdivision is subject to Section 2115, and neither corporation is a “blind pool” company, as that term is defined by the commissioner.

(B) Is not issuing fractional undivided interests in oil or gas rights, or a similar interest in other mineral rights.

(C) Is not an investment company subject to the Investment Company Act of 1940.

(D) Is not subject to the reporting requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.

(2) The offering is conducted in accordance with the requirements of Section 3(a)(11) of the Securities Act of 1933 and Rule 147 (17 C.F.R. 230.147) or Rule 147A (17 C.F.R. 230.147A) under that act.

(3) The
 offering is conducted in accordance with the requirements of Subpart B of Regulation CF (17 C.F.R. 227.100 to 227.206, inclusive), except as follows:

(A) The aggregate amount of securities sold to all investors by the issuer in reliance on this subdivision during the 12-month period preceding the date of such offer or sale, including the securities offered in such transaction, shall not exceed three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000).

(B) The issuer may comply with the requirements of paragraph (t)(1), instead of paragraph (t)(2), of Section 227.201 of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) Such issuer shall prominently provide a statement that financial information certified by the principal executive officer of the issuer has been provided instead of financial statements reviewed by a public accountant
 that is independent of the issuer. The aggregate offering price for all securities sold (within the 12 months before the start, and during the offering, of the securities) under Rule 147 or Rule 147A under the Securities Act of 1933 or in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 5 of that act shall be included in the aggregate offering price for purposes of this paragraph.

(4) Integration of offers and sales made in reliance on this section shall be governed by Section 230.152 of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(5) The issuer has taken reasonable steps to ensure that each purchaser who is a natural person who is not an accredited investor as defined in Rule 501 (17 C.F.R. 230.501) under the Securities Act of 1933, either alone or with their purchaser representative or representatives, has knowledge and experience in financial and business matters and that they are
 capable of evaluating the merits and risks of the prospective investment.

(6) The purchaser shall have a three-day right to rescind any investment made in any security offered under this subdivision. The three-day period shall end at 11:59 p.m. Pacific standard time on the third business day after the date on which the issuer’s confirmation of its acceptance of the purchaser’s investment is communicated in writing and received by the purchaser.

(7) The issuer shall set aside in a separate third-party escrow account all funds raised as part of the offering, to be held in escrow until the time that the minimum offering amount, if any, is reached. If the minimum offering amount is not reached within one year of the effective date of the offering, the issuer shall return all funds to purchasers.

(8) The issuer shall not,
 itself or through any third party not licensed as a broker-dealer, conduct any direct solicitation of the securities offered by this subdivision.

(9) The issuer shall not require or impose an obligation on any purchaser or potential purchaser to do any of the following:

(A) Waive the right to a jury trial in a court action.

(B) Be bound by or subject to any law other than California law.

(C) File or resolve any claim or dispute in any forum other than California.

(10) The issuer shall file, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, a notice of transactions under this subdivision at least 15 days prior to the publication of an initial offer of the securities. The failure to file the notice
 or the failure to file the notice within the time specified shall not affect the availability of the exemption so long as the issuer, within 15 business days after discovery of the failure to file the notice or after demand by the commissioner, whichever occurs first, files the notice and pays to the commissioner a fee equal to the fee payable had the transaction been qualified under Section 25110. Neither the filing of the notice nor the failure by the commissioner to comment thereon precludes the commissioner from taking any action that the commissioner deems necessary or appropriate under this division with respect to the offer and sale of the securities.

(11) The issuer submits all state, federal, or other filings related to the offer or sale of securities under this subdivision to the Commissioner of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation. The filings shall be submitted electronically and in compliance with the Americans for
 Disability Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and the Web Content Accessibility Guidelines 2.0, or its subsequent versions.

(12) The issuer pays any fees required by subdivision (c) of Section 25608.

(13) Any other requirement set forth by rule adopted by the commissioner.

(14) To the extent allowable, any inconsistency between federal and state law shall be interpreted to the benefit of investors or potential investors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 72.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25102.1.

The following transactions are not subject to Sections 25110, 25120, and 25130:

(a) Any offer or sale of a security to a “qualified purchaser” as that term is defined by rule of the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 18(b)(3) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. 77r), if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) A notice is filed with the commissioner prior to an offer in this state, along with any documents filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission in annual or periodic reports that the commissioner by rule or order deems appropriate.

(2) A consent to service of process under Section 25165 is filed with the notice
 required by paragraph (1).

(3) Payment of a notice filing fee provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 25608.1.

(b) Any offer and sale of a security with respect to a transaction that is exempt from registration under Section 4(4) of the Securities Act of 1933 pursuant to Section 18(b)(4)(B) of that act.

(c) Any offer or sale of a security with respect to a transaction that is exempt from registration under the Securities Act of 1933 pursuant to Section 18(b)(4)(C) of that act.

(d) Any offer or sale of a security with respect to a transaction that is exempt from registration under the Securities Act of 1933 pursuant to Section 18 (b)(4)(F) of that act, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) A notice in the form of a copy of the completed Form D (17 C.F.R. 239.500) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission is filed with the commissioner within 15 days of the first sale in this state, along with documents filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission in annual or periodic reports that the commissioner by rule or order deems appropriate. The commissioner may allow for a notice in the form of the electronic transmission of the information in Form D.

(2) A consent to service of process under Section 25165 is filed with the notice as required by paragraph (1).

(3) Payment of the notice filing fee provided for in subdivision (c) of Section 25608.1 is made.

(e) Notwithstanding the language of subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section, an issuer may file an application for
 qualification pursuant to Section 25111, 25112, 25113, 25121, 25131, or 25142.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 46.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25102.2.

The commissioner shall require any issuer that is engaged in the business of purchasing, selling, financing, or brokering real estate, and that relies upon an exemption authorized by subdivision (e), (f), (h), or (n) of Section 25102, for an offering which involves the offer or sale of securities to any person who is not an accredited investor, as defined in Regulation D of the Securities and Exchange Commission (17 C.F.R. 230.501 et seq.), in a transaction that is not registered pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933, to provide additional information regarding the nature of the proposed offering on a form prescribed by the commissioner. This information shall include the names of the issuer’s officers and directors in the case of a corporation, managers in the case of a manager-managed limited liability
 company, members in the case of a member-managed limited liability company, general partner in the case of a limited partnership, or persons performing similar functions in the case of other types of issuers, the offering disclosure documents provided to prospective purchasers, a list of all state and federal licenses required to further the purposes of the investment, and the names of all licensed persons that will undertake those activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 263, Sec. 4.   (SB 647)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25102.5.

There shall be exempted from Section 25110 a transaction that is the sale of a series of notes secured directly by an interest in the same real property, or the sale of undivided interests in a note secured directly by real property equivalent to a series transaction, that complies with all of the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 10237) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code. For purposes of this section, a real estate broker licensed by the Real Estate Commissioner of this state who engages in the offer and sale of notes secured directly by real property of various makers, which are a series of notes or notes in which undivided interests are offered and sold, shall be deemed to be the issuer of these notes and undivided interests if the notes of the various makers are offered and sold pursuant to a plan or arrangement that is common to the various makers with respect to documentation and loan standards and that include provisions for servicing these notes on behalf of purchasers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 902, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25103.

The following transactions are exempted from the provisions of Section 25110 and Section 25120:

(a) Any negotiations or agreements prior to general solicitation of approval by the holders of equity securities, and subject to that approval, of (1) a change in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding securities, (2) a merger, consolidation, or sale of assets in consideration of the issuance of securities, or (3) an entity conversion transaction.

(b) Any change in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding securities or any entity conversion transaction, unless the holders of at least 25 percent of the outstanding shares or
 units of any class of securities that will be directly or indirectly affected substantially and adversely by that change or transaction have addresses in this state according to the records of the issuer.

(c) Any exchange incident to a merger, consolidation, or sale of assets in consideration of the issuance of securities of another issuer, unless at least 25 percent of the outstanding securities of any class, any holders of which are to receive securities in the exchange, are held by persons who have addresses in this state according to the records of the issuer of which they are holders. This exemption is not available for a rollup transaction as defined by Section 25014.6. The exemption is also not available for a transaction excluded from the definition of rollup transaction by virtue of paragraph (5) or (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 25014.6 if the transaction is one of a series of transactions that directly or indirectly through
 acquisition or otherwise involves the combination or reorganization of one or more rollup participants.

(d) For the purposes of subdivision (b) and subdivision (c) of this section, (1) any securities held to the knowledge of the issuer in the names of broker-dealers or nominees of broker-dealers and (2) any securities controlled by any one person who controls directly or indirectly 50 percent or more of the outstanding securities of that class shall not be considered outstanding. The determination of whether 25 percent of the outstanding securities are held by persons having addresses in this state, for the purposes of subdivision (b) and subdivision (c) of this section, shall be made as of the record date for the determination of the security holders entitled to vote on or consent to the action, if approval of those holders is required, or, if not, as of the date of directors’ approval of that action.

(e) Any change (other than a stock split or reverse stock split) in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding equity securities, except the following if they materially and adversely affect any class of equity securities: (1) to add, change, or delete assessment provisions; (2) to change the rights to dividends thereon; (3) to change the redemption provisions; (4) to make them redeemable; (5) to change the amount payable on liquidation; (6) to change, add, or delete conversion rights; (7) to change, add, or delete voting rights; (8) to change, add, or delete preemptive rights; (9) to change, add, or delete sinking fund provisions; (10) to rearrange the relative priorities of outstanding equity securities; (11) to impose, change, or delete restrictions upon the transfer of equity securities in the organizational documents for the entity; (12) to change the right of holders of equity securities with respect to the
 calling of special meetings of holders of equity securities; and (13) to change, add, or delete any rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of, or on, the outstanding shares or memberships of a mutual water company or other corporation or entity organized primarily to provide services or facilities to its shareholders or members. Changes in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding equity securities do not materially and adversely affect any class of holders of equity securities within the meaning of this subdivision if they arise from (i) the addition to articles of incorporation of the provisions described or referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 158 upon the conversion of an existing corporation to a close corporation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 158, (ii) the deletion from the articles of incorporation of the provisions described or referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 158 upon the voluntary termination of close corporation status pursuant to
 subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 158, (iii) the involuntary cessation of close corporation status pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 158, or (iv) the termination of a shareholders’ agreement pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 300.

(f) Any stock split or reverse stock split, except the following: (1) any stock split or reverse stock split if the corporation has more than one class of shares outstanding and the split would have a material effect on the proportionate interests of the respective classes as to voting, dividends, or distributions; (2) any stock split of a stock that is traded in the market and its market price as of the date of directors’ approval of the stock split adjusted to give effect to the split was less than two dollars ($2) per share; and (3) any reverse stock split if the corporation has the option of paying cash for any fractional shares created by the reverse split and as a result of that action the
 proportionate interests of the shareholders would be substantially altered. Any shares issued upon a stock split or reverse stock split exempted by this subdivision shall be subject to any conditions previously imposed by the commissioner applicable to the shares with respect to which they are issued.

(g) Any change in the rights of outstanding debt securities, except the following if they substantially and adversely affect any class of securities: (1) to change the rights to interest thereon; (2) to change their redemption provisions; (3) to make them redeemable; (4) to extend the maturity thereof or to change the amount payable thereon at maturity; (5) to change their voting rights; (6) to change their conversion rights; (7) to change sinking fund provisions; and (8) to make them subordinate to other indebtedness.

(h) Any exchange incident to a merger, consolidation, or sale of
 assets, other than a rollup transaction (as defined in Section 25014.6), in consideration of the issuance of equity securities of another entity or any entity conversion transaction that meets the following conditions:

(1) The exchange incident to a merger, consolidation, or sale of assets or the entity conversion transaction, had the exchange transaction involved the issuance of a security in a transaction subject to the provisions of Section 25110, would have been exempt from qualification by subdivision (f) of Section 25102, without giving effect to paragraph (3) thereof, and either of the following is applicable:

(A) (i) Not less than 75 percent of the outstanding equity securities of each constituent or converting entity entitled to vote on the proposed transaction voted in favor of the transaction, (ii) not more than 10 percent of the outstanding equity
 securities of each constituent or converting entity entitled to vote on the proposed transaction voted against the transaction, and (iii) each constituent or converting entity whose security holders are entitled to vote on the proposed transaction is subject to a state statute that has provisions for dissenters’ rights for holders of equity securities entitled to vote on the proposed transaction that do not vote in favor of or voted against the transaction.

(B) (i) The transaction is solely for the purposes of changing the issuer’s state of incorporation or organization, or form of organization, (ii) all the securities of the same class or series, unless all the security holders of the class or series consent, are treated equally, and (iii) the holders of nonredeemable voting equity securities receive nonredeemable voting equity securities.

(2) The
 commissioner may, by rule, require the acquiring or surviving entity to file a notice of transaction under this section. However, the failure to file the notice or the failure to file the notice within the time specified by the rule of the commissioner shall not affect the availability of this exemption. An acquiring or surviving entity that fails to file the notice as provided by rule of the commissioner shall, within 15 business days after demand by the commissioner, file the notice and pay to the commissioner a fee equal to the fee payable had the transaction been qualified under Section 25110 or 25120.

(i) Any exchange of securities in connection with any merger or consolidation or sale of corporate assets in consideration wholly or in part of the issuance of securities or any entity conversion transaction under, or pursuant to, a plan of reorganization that pursuant to the provisions of the United States Bankruptcy Code (Title 11 of the
 United States Code) has been confirmed or is subject to confirmation by the decree or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 29.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25104.

The following transactions are exempted from the provisions of Section 25130:

(a) Any offer or sale of a security by the bona fide owner thereof for his or her own account if the sale (1) is not accompanied by the publication of any advertisement and (2) is not effected by or through a broker-dealer in a public offering.

(b) Any offer or sale effected by or through a licensed broker-dealer pursuant to an unsolicited order or offer to buy. For the purpose of this subdivision, an inquiry regarding a written bid for a security or a written solicitation of an offer to sell a security made by another broker-dealer within the previous 60 days shall not be considered the solicitation of an order or offer to buy.

(c) Any offer or sale to a bank, savings and loan association, trust company, insurance company, investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, pension or profit-sharing trust (other than a pension or profit-sharing trust of the issuer, a self-employed individual retirement plan, or individual retirement account), or such other institutional investor or governmental agency or instrumentality as the commissioner may designate by rule, whether the purchaser is acting for itself or as trustee; provided the purchaser represents that it is purchasing for its own account (or for the trust account) for investment and not with a view to or for sale in connection with any distribution of the security.

(d) Any transaction or agreement between a person on whose behalf an offering is made and an underwriter or among underwriters, if the sale of the securities is exempt from qualification at the time of or qualified prior to distribution in this state, if any.

(e) Any offer or sale of any security by or for the account of a bona fide secured party selling the security in the ordinary course of business to liquidate a bona fide debt.

(f) Any transaction by an executor, administrator, sheriff, marshal, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, guardian, or conservator.

(g) Any offer (but not a sale) of a security for which a registration statement has been filed under the Securities Act of 1933 but has not yet become effective, or for which an offering statement under Regulation A has been filed but has not yet been qualified, if no stop order or refusal order is in effect and no public proceeding or examination looking toward such an order is pending under Section 8 of that act and no order under Section 25140 or subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect under this division.

(h) Any offer or sale of a security if a qualification under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25110) of this part for any securities of the same class has become effective within 18 months, or longer period as the commissioner may order provided that each consecutive order shall be for no more than six months, prior to the offer or sale or if a qualification under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25120) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 25130) of this part for any securities of the same class has become effective within 12 months prior to that offer or sale, provided no order under Section 25140 or subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect under this division with respect to the qualification, and, provided further, that this exemption does not apply to securities offered pursuant to a registration under the Securities Act of 1933 or pursuant to an exemption under Regulation A under that act if the aggregate offering price of the securities offered under such exemption exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The commissioner may, by rule or order, withhold this exemption with respect to securities qualified only pursuant to a limited offering qualification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 193, Sec. 2.   Effective July 26, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

25105.

There shall be exempted from the provisions of Section 25110, 25120 or 25130 any other transaction which the commissioner by rule exempts as not being comprehended within the purposes of this law and the qualification of which he finds is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Issuer Transactions [25110. - 25118.]

25110.

It is unlawful for any person to offer or sell in this state any security in an issuer transaction (other than in a transaction subject to Section 25120), whether or not by or through underwriters, unless such sale has been qualified under Section 25111, 25112 or 25113 (and no order under Section 25140 or subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect with respect to such qualification) or unless such security or transaction is exempted or not subject to qualification under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 25100) of this part. The offer or sale of such a security in a manner that varies or differs from, exceeds the scope of, or fails to conform with either a material term or material condition of qualification of the offering as set forth in the permit or qualification order, or a material representation as to the manner of offering which is set forth in the application for qualification, shall be an unqualified offer or sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 391, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25111.

(a) Any security for which a registration statement has been filed under the Securities Act of 1933 in connection with the same offering may be qualified by coordination under this section either in an issuer or nonissuer transaction. The term “registration statement” as used in this section includes an offering statement as defined by Rule 252(a) under Regulation A (17 C.F.R. 230.252(a)) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. The term “effective,” as used in this section in connection with an offering statement, means an offering statement that has been qualified under Regulation A of the Securities Act of 1933.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), an application for qualification under this section shall contain the following information and be accompanied by the following documents, in addition to the information specified in Section 25160 and the consent to service of process required by Section 25165: (1) a copy of the registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, together with all exhibits (other than exhibits incorporated by reference and those specified by rule of the commissioner, unless requested by the commissioner); (2) an undertaking to forward to the commissioner all future amendments to the registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933, other than an amendment that merely delays the effective date of the registration statement, promptly and in any event not later than the first business day after the day they are forwarded to or filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, whichever first occurs; and (3) other information required to evidence compliance with any rules of the commissioner. The application must be filed with the commissioner not later than the fifth business day following filing of the registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission, unless that time is extended by rule or order of the commissioner.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), qualification of the sale of securities under this section automatically becomes effective (and the securities may be offered and sold in accordance with the terms of the application as amended) at the moment the federal registration statement becomes effective if all the following conditions are satisfied: (1) no stop order or order under subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect under this law; (2) the application has been on file with the commissioner for at least 10 days; and (3) a statement of the maximum and minimum proposed offering prices and the maximum underwriting discounts and commissions has been on file for two business days or such shorter period as the commissioner permits by rule or order and the offering is made within those limitations. The applicant shall promptly notify the commissioner by telephone or telegram of the date and time when the federal registration statement became effective and the content of the price amendment, if any, and shall promptly file a posteffective amendment to the application containing the information and documents in the price amendment. “Price amendment” means the final federal amendment that includes a statement of the offering price, underwriting and selling discounts or commissions, amount of proceeds, interest, dividend or conversion rates, call prices and other matters related to the offering price. Upon failure to receive the required notification and posteffective amendment with respect to the price amendment, the commissioner may enter a stop order, without notice or hearing, retroactively denying effectiveness to the application for qualification or suspending its effectiveness until compliance with this subdivision, if he or she promptly notifies the applicant by telephone or telegram (and promptly confirms by letter or telegram when he or she notifies by telephone) of the issuance of the order. If the applicant proves compliance with the requirements of this subdivision as to notice and posteffective amendment, the stop order is void as of the time of its entry. The commissioner may by rule or order waive either or both of the conditions specified in clauses (2) and (3) of this subdivision. If the federal registration statement becomes effective before all the conditions in this subdivision are satisfied and they are not waived, the application for qualification automatically becomes effective as soon as all the conditions are satisfied. If the applicant advises the commissioner of the date when the federal registration statement is expected to become effective, the commissioner shall promptly advise the applicant by telephone or telegram, at the applicant’s expense, whether all the conditions are satisfied and whether he or she then contemplates the institution of a proceeding under Section 25140 or 25143; but this advice by the commissioner does not preclude the institution of such a proceeding at any time.

(d) (1) An open-end investment company or a unit investment trust that has previously qualified the sale of its securities pursuant to this section shall, in lieu of filing the application specified in subdivision (b), file pursuant to this subdivision if it has made no material change in its offering and if it is in compliance with all terms of its prior qualification. An application filed pursuant to this subdivision shall contain the following information and be accompanied by the following documents, in addition to the information specified in Section 25160 and the consent to service of process required by Section 25165: (A) a statement that the applicant has made no material change in its offering and that it is in compliance with the terms of its qualification; and (B) a copy of its current registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933.
